Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1224
Simulcast; authorized; legislative findings.

(1) The Legislature finds that:

(a) The horseracing, horse breeding, and parimutuel wagering industry is an important sector of the agricultural economy of the state, provides substantial revenue for state and local governments, and employs many residents of the state;

(b) The simultaneous telecast of live audio and visual signals of horseraces conducted within the state on which parimutuel betting is permitted holds the potential to strengthen and further these economic contributions and it is in the best interest of the state to permit such live telecasts;

(c) Permitting parimutuel wagering on the results of horseracing conducted at racetracks outside the state also holds the potential to strengthen and further these economic contributions and it is in the best interest of the state to permit such wagering; and

(d) No simulcast or interstate simulcast shall be authorized which would jeopardize present live racing, horse breeding, or employment opportunities or which would infringe on current operations or markets of the racetracks which generate significant revenue for local governments in the state.

(2) The Legislature hereby authorizes the telecasts of horseraces conducted within the state on which parimutuel wagering shall be permitted and interstate simulcasting under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission in the manner and subject to the conditions provided in sections 2-1207 and 2-1224 to 2-1229.

Laws 1987, LB 708, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 591, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 22.